West Virginia, session 2026, SB263.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 3. Authorization for Division of Water and Waste Management to promulgate legislative rules. §64-3-1. Division of Water and Waste Management. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on July 23, 2025, authorized under the authority of §22-18-6 of this code, relating to the Division of Water and Waste Management (hazardous waste management system, 33 CSR 20), is authorized.